New York, session 2025-2026, S9189.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 101 of section 2 of chapter 772 2 of the laws of 1966, relating to enabling any city having a population 3 of one million or more to raise tax revenue, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (a) General.--A tax at the rate of four percent is hereby imposed for 6 each taxable year, beginning with taxable years ending after January 7 first, nineteen hundred sixty-six, on the unincorporated business taxa- 8 ble income of every unincorporated business wholly or partly carried on 9 within the city, provided that, for taxable years beginning on or after 10 January first, two thousand twenty-six, for any portion of such unincor- 11 porated business taxable income greater than five million dollars, such 12 tax for such portion shall be at a rate of four and four-tenths percent. 13 This tax shall be in addition to any other taxes imposed. 14 § 2. Subdivision (a) of section 11-503 of the administrative code of 15 the city of New York is amended to read as follows: 16 (a) General. A tax at the rate of four percent is hereby imposed for 17 each taxable year, beginning with taxable years ending after January 18 first, nineteen hundred sixty-six, on the unincorporated business taxa- 19 ble income of every unincorporated business wholly or partly carried on 20 within the city, provided that, for taxable years beginning on or after EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14860-02-6 S. 9189--A 2 1 January first, two thousand twenty-six, for any portion of such unincor- 2 porated business taxable income greater than five million dollars, such 3 tax for such portion shall be at a rate of four and four-tenths percent. 4 This tax shall be in addition to any other taxes imposed. 5 § 3. Clauses 1 and 3 of subparagraph (a) of paragraph E of subdivision 6 1 of section 11-604 of the administrative code of the city of New York, 7 as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, are amended to read as 8 follows: 9 (1) an amount computed, for taxable years beginning before nineteen 10 hundred eighty-seven, at the rate of nine per centum, [and] for taxable 11 years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-six and before January 12 first, two thousand twenty-six, at the rate of eight and eighty-five 13 one-hundredths per centum, and for taxable years beginning on or after 14 January first, two thousand twenty-six, at the rate of ten and sixty-two 15 one-hundredths per centum, of its entire net income or the portion of 16 such entire net income allocated within the city as hereinafter 17 provided, subject to any modification required by paragraphs (d) and (e) 18 of subdivision three of this section, 19 (3) an amount computed, for taxable years beginning before nineteen 20 hundred eighty-seven, at the rate of nine per centum, [and] for taxable 21 years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-six and before January 22 first, two thousand twenty-six, at the rate of eight and eighty-five 23 one-hundredths per centum, and for taxable years beginning on or after 24 January first, two thousand twenty-six, at the rate of ten and sixty-two 25 one-hundredths per centum, on thirty per centum of the taxpayer's entire 26 net income plus salaries and other compensation paid to the taxpayer's 27 elected or appointed officers and to every stockholder owning in excess 28 of five per centum of its issued capital stock minus fifteen thousand 29 dollars (subject to proration as hereinafter provided) and any net loss 30 for the reported year, or on the portion of any such sum allocated with- 31 in the city as hereinafter provided for the allocation of entire net 32 income, subject to any modification required by paragraphs (d) and (e) 33 of subdivision three of this section, provided, however, that for taxa- 34 ble years beginning on or after July first, nineteen hundred ninety-six, 35 the provisions of paragraph H of this subdivision shall apply for 36 purposes of the computation under this clause, or 37 § 4. The opening paragraph of subparagraph 2 of paragraph (a) of 38 subdivision 18 of section 11-604 of the administrative code of the city 39 of New York, as amended by chapter 128 of the laws of 1996, is amended 40 to read as follows: 41 The amount determined in this subparagraph is the product of (A) the 42 excess of (i) the tax computed under clause one of subparagraph (a) of 43 paragraph E of subdivision one of this section, without allowance of any 44 credits allowed by this section, over (ii) the tax so computed, deter- 45 mined as if the corporation had no such distributive share or guaranteed 46 payments with respect to the unincorporated business, and (B) a frac- 47 tion, the numerator of which is four and the denominator of which is 48 eight and eighty-five one hundredths, provided, however, that for a 49 taxable year beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty- 50 six, such denominator shall be equal to ten and sixty-two one-hun- 51 dredths, and provided further that the amounts computed in clauses (i) 52 and (ii) of this subparagraph shall be computed with the following 53 modifications: 54 § 5. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 18 of section 55 11-604 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by 56 chapter 128 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as follows: S. 9189--A 3 1 (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in paragraph (a) of this 2 subdivision, in the case of a corporation that, before the application 3 of this subdivision or any other credit allowed by this section, is 4 liable for the tax on entire net income under clause one of subparagraph 5 (a) of paragraph E of subdivision one of this section, the credit or the 6 sum of the credits that may be taken by such corporation for a taxable 7 year under this subdivision with respect to an unincorporated business 8 or unincorporated businesses in which it is a partner shall not exceed 9 the tax so computed, without allowance of any credits allowed by this 10 section, multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which is four and the 11 denominator of which is eight and eighty-five one hundredths, provided, 12 however, that for a taxable year beginning on or after January first, 13 two thousand twenty-six, such denominator shall be equal to ten and 14 sixty-two one-hundredths. If the credit allowed under this subdivision 15 or the sum of such credits exceeds the product of such tax and such 16 fraction, the amount of the excess may be carried forward, in order, to 17 each of the seven immediately succeeding taxable years and, to the 18 extent not previously taken, shall be allowed as a credit in each of 19 such years. In applying the provisions of the preceding sentence, the 20 credit determined for the taxable year under paragraph (a) of this 21 subdivision shall be taken before taking any credit carryforward pursu- 22 ant to this paragraph and the credit carryforward attributable to the 23 earliest taxable year shall be taken before taking a credit carryforward 24 attributable to a subsequent taxable year. 25 § 6. Subdivision (a) of section 11-643.5 of the administrative code of 26 the city of New York, as added by local law number 37 of the city of New 27 York for the year 1986, is amended to read as follows: 28 (a) Basic tax. Nine percent of the taxpayer's entire net income, or 29 the portion thereof allocated to the city, for the taxable year or part 30 thereof, provided that, for a taxable year beginning on or after January 31 first, two thousand twenty-six, or part thereof, such basic tax shall be 32 equal to ten and eight-tenths percent of the taxpayer's entire net 33 income, or the portion thereof allocated to the city. 34 § 7. The opening paragraph of paragraph 2 of subdivision (a) of 35 section 11-643.8 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as 36 amended by chapter 128 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as 37 follows: 38 The amount determined in this paragraph is the product of (A) the 39 excess of (i) the basic tax computed pursuant to subdivision (a) of 40 section 11-643.5 of this part, without allowance of any credits allowed 41 by this part, over (ii) the basic tax so computed, determined as if the 42 banking corporation had no such distributive share or guaranteed 43 payments with respect to the unincorporated business, and (B) a frac- 44 tion, the numerator of which is four and the denominator of which is 45 nine, provided, however, that for a taxable year beginning on or after 46 January first, two thousand twenty-six, such denominator shall be equal 47 to ten and eight-tenths, and provided further that the amounts computed 48 in clauses (i) and (ii) of this paragraph shall be computed with the 49 following modifications: 50 § 8. Paragraph 1 of subdivision (b) of section 11-643.8 of the admin- 51 istrative code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 128 of the 52 laws of 1996, is amended to read as follows: 53 (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in subdivision (a) of 54 this section, in the case of a banking corporation that, before the 55 application of this section or any other credit allowed by this part, is 56 liable for the basic tax computed under subdivision (a) of section S. 9189--A 4 1 11-643.5 of this part, the credit or the sum of the credits that may be 2 taken by such banking corporation for a taxable year under this section 3 with respect to an unincorporated business or unincorporated businesses 4 in which it is a partner shall not exceed the tax so computed, without 5 allowance of any credits allowed by this part, multiplied by a fraction 6 the numerator of which is four and the denominator of which is nine, 7 provided, however, that for a taxable year beginning on or after January 8 first, two thousand twenty-six, such denominator shall be equal to ten 9 and eight-tenths. If the credit allowed under this subdivision or the 10 sum of such credits exceeds the product of such tax and such fraction, 11 the amount of the excess may be carried forward, in order, to each of 12 the seven immediately succeeding taxable years and, to the extent not 13 previously taken, shall be allowed as a credit in each of such years. In 14 applying the provisions of the preceding sentence, the credit determined 15 for the taxable year under subdivision (a) of this section shall be 16 taken before taking any credit carryforward pursuant to this paragraph 17 and the credit carryforward attributable to the earliest taxable year 18 shall be taken before taking a credit carryforward attributable to a 19 subsequent taxable year. 20 § 9. Clause (i) of subparagraph 1 of paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of 21 section 11-654 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as 22 added by section 1 of part D of chapter 60 of the laws of 2015, is 23 amended to read as follows: 24 (i) an amount computed on its business income or the portion of such 25 business income allocated within the city as hereinafter provided, 26 subject to the application of paragraphs (j) and (k) of this subdivision 27 and any modification required by paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision 28 three of this section, at the rate of (1) for a taxable year beginning 29 before January first, two thousand twenty-six, nine per centum for 30 financial corporations, as defined in this clause, and for a taxable 31 year beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty-six, ten 32 and eight-tenths per centum for financial corporations, or (2) for a 33 taxable year beginning before January first, two thousand twenty-six, 34 eight and eighty-five one hundredths per centum for all other corpo- 35 rations, and for a taxable year beginning on or after January first, two 36 thousand twenty-six, ten and sixty-two one-hundredths per centum for all 37 other corporations. For purposes of this clause, "financial corporation" 38 means a corporation or, if the corporation is included in a combined 39 group, a combined group, that (A) has total assets reflected on its 40 balance sheet at the end of its taxable year in excess of one hundred 41 billion dollars, computed under generally accepted accounting principles 42 and (B)(I) allocates more than fifty percent of the receipts included in 43 the denominator of its receipts fraction, determined under section 44 11-654.2 of this subchapter, pursuant to subdivision five of section 45 11-654.2 of this subchapter for its taxable year, or (II) is itself or 46 is included in a combined group in which more than fifty percent of the 47 total assets reflected on its balance sheet at the end of its taxable 48 year are held by one or more corporations that are classified as (a) 49 registered under state law as a bank holding company or registered under 50 the Federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841, et seq., 51 as amended), or registered as a savings and loan holding company under 52 the Federal National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. 1701, as amended), (b) a 53 national bank organized and existing as a national bank association 54 pursuant to the provisions of the National Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. 21 et. 55 seq., (c) a savings association or federal savings bank as defined in 56 the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. § 1813(b)(1), (d) a bank, S. 9189--A 5 1 savings association, or thrift institution incorporated or organized 2 under the laws of any state, (e) a corporation organized under the 3 provisions of 12 U.S.C. §§ 611 to 631, (f) an agency or branch or a 4 foreign depository as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 3101, (g) a registered 5 securities or commodities broker or dealer registered as such by the 6 securities and exchange commission or the commodities futures trading 7 commission, which shall include an OTC derivatives dealer as defined 8 under regulations of the securities and exchange commission at title 17, 9 part 240, section 3b-12 of the code of federal regulations (17 CFR 10 240.3b-12), or (h) any corporation whose voting stock is more than fifty 11 percent owned, directly or indirectly, by any person or business entity 12 described in subitems (a) through (g) of this item, other than an insur- 13 ance company taxable under article thirty-three of the tax law; or 14 § 10. Subparagraphs 2 and 3 of paragraph (j) of subdivision 1 of 15 section 11-654 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as 16 added by section 1 of part D of chapter 60 of the laws of 2015, are 17 amended to read as follows: 18 (2) Subject to subparagraph three of this paragraph, if the amount of 19 business income allocated within the city as hereinafter provided is one 20 million dollars or greater but less than one million five hundred thou- 21 sand dollars, the amount computed in clause (i) of subparagraph one of 22 paragraph (e) of this subdivision shall be at the rate of (i) six and 23 five-tenths per centum, plus (ii) [two and thirty-five one-hundredths 24 per centum] a general scaling factor multiplied by a fraction the numer- 25 ator of which is allocated business income less one million dollars and 26 the denominator of which is five hundred thousand dollars, of the amount 27 of business income allocated within the city as hereinafter provided, 28 subject to any modification required by paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdi- 29 vision three of this section; 30 (3) Provided, however, notwithstanding anything to the contrary, if 31 the amount of business income before allocation is two million dollars 32 or greater but less than three million dollars, the rate of tax provided 33 for in this paragraph shall not be less than (i) six and five-tenths per 34 centum, plus (ii) [two and thirty-five one-hundredths per centum] a 35 general scaling factor multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which 36 is business income before allocation less two million dollars and the 37 denominator of which is one million dollars, and provided, however, 38 notwithstanding anything to the contrary, if the amount of business 39 income before allocation is three million dollars or greater, the rate 40 of tax shall be eight and eighty-five one-hundredths percentum for a 41 taxable year beginning before January first, two thousand twenty-six, 42 and ten and sixty-two one-hundredths per centum for a taxable year 43 beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty-six, or, in the 44 case of a financial corporation, as defined in clause (i) of subpara- 45 graph one of paragraph (e) of this subdivision [one of section 11-654], 46 if the amount of business income before allocation is three million 47 dollars or greater the rate of tax shall be nine per centum for a taxa- 48 ble year beginning before January first, two thousand twenty-six, and 49 ten and eight-tenths per centum for a taxable year beginning on or after 50 January first, two thousand twenty-six. For the purposes of this subpar- 51 agraph and subparagraph two of this paragraph, the term "general scaling 52 factor" means a value equal to two and thirty-five one-hundredths per 53 centum for a taxable year beginning before January first, two thousand 54 twenty-six, or a value equal to four and twelve one-hundredths per 55 centum for a taxable year beginning on or after January first, two thou- 56 sand twenty-six. S. 9189--A 6 1 § 11. Subparagraphs 2 and 3 of paragraph (k) of subdivision 1 of 2 section 11-654 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as 3 added by section 1 of part D of chapter 60 of the laws of 2015, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 (2) Subject to subparagraph three of this paragraph for qualified New 6 York manufacturing corporations as defined in subparagraph four of this 7 paragraph, if the amount of business income allocated within the city as 8 hereinafter provided is ten million dollars or greater but less than 9 twenty million dollars, the amount computed in clause (i) of subpara- 10 graph one of paragraph (e) of this subdivision shall be at the rate of 11 (i) four and four hundred twenty-five one-thousandths per centum, plus 12 (ii) [four and four hundred twenty-five one-thousandths per centum] a 13 manufacturing scaling factor multiplied by a fraction the numerator of 14 which is allocated business income less ten million dollars and the 15 denominator of which is ten million dollars, of its business income or 16 the portion of such business income allocated within the city as herein- 17 after provided, subject to any modification required by paragraphs (d) 18 and (e) of subdivision three of this section; 19 (3) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, if the amount of busi- 20 ness income before allocation is twenty million dollars or greater but 21 less than forty million dollars, the rate of tax provided for in this 22 paragraph shall not be less than (i) four and four hundred twenty-five 23 one thousandths percentum, plus (ii) [four and four hundred twenty-five 24 one thousandths percentum] a manufacturing scaling factor multiplied by 25 a fraction the numerator of which is business income before allocation 26 less twenty million dollars and the denominator of which is twenty 27 million dollars, and provided, however, notwithstanding anything to the 28 contrary, if the amount of business income before allocation is forty 29 million dollars or greater, the rate of tax shall be eight and eighty- 30 five one-hundredths per centum for a taxable year beginning before Janu- 31 ary first, two thousand twenty-six, and ten and sixty-two one-hundredths 32 per centum for a taxable year beginning on or after January first, two 33 thousand twenty-six. For the purposes of this subparagraph and subpara- 34 graph two of this paragraph, the term "manufacturing scaling factor" 35 means a value equal to four and four hundred twenty-five one-thousandths 36 per centum for a taxable year beginning before January first, two thou- 37 sand twenty-six, or a value equal to six and one hundred ninety-five 38 one-thousandths per centum for a taxable year beginning on or after 39 January first, two thousand twenty-six. 40 § 12. The opening paragraph of subparagraph 2 of paragraph (a) of 41 subdivision 18 of section 11-654 of the administrative code of the city 42 of New York, as amended by section 12 of part P of chapter 60 of the 43 laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 44 The amount determined in this subparagraph is the product of (i) the 45 excess of (A) the tax computed under clause (i) of subparagraph one of 46 paragraph (e) of subdivision one of this section, without allowance of 47 any credits allowed by this section, over (B) the tax so computed, 48 determined as if the corporation had no such distributive share or guar- 49 anteed payments with respect to the unincorporated business, and (ii) a 50 fraction, the numerator of which is four and the denominator of which, 51 for a taxable year beginning before January first, two thousand twenty- 52 six, is eight and eighty-five one hundredths, provided that, for a taxa- 53 ble year beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty-six, 54 such denominator is ten and sixty-two one-hundredths, [except] and 55 provided further that in the case of a financial corporation as defined 56 in clause (i) of subparagraph one of paragraph (e) of subdivision one of S. 9189--A 7 1 this section, for a taxable year beginning before January first, two 2 thousand twenty-six, such denominator is nine, and for a taxable year 3 beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty-six, such 4 denominator is ten and eight-tenths, and provided further that in the 5 case of a taxpayer that is subject to paragraph (j) or (k) of subdivi- 6 sion one of this section, such denominator shall be the rate of tax as 7 determined by such paragraph (j) or (k) for the taxable year; provided 8 that the amounts computed in subclauses (A) and (B) of clause (i) of 9 this subparagraph shall be computed with the following modifications: 10 § 13. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 18 of section 11 11-654 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by 12 section 13 of part P of chapter 60 of the laws of 2016, is amended to 13 read as follows: 14 (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in paragraph (a) of this 15 subdivision, in the case of a corporation that, before the application 16 of this subdivision or any other credit allowed by this section, is 17 liable for the tax on business income under clause (i) of subparagraph 18 one of paragraph (e) of subdivision one of this section, the credit or 19 the sum of the credits that may be taken by such corporation for a taxa- 20 ble year under this subdivision with respect to an unincorporated busi- 21 ness or unincorporated businesses in which it is a partner shall not 22 exceed the tax so computed, without allowance of any credits allowed by 23 this section, multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which is four 24 and the denominator of which is eight and eighty-five one-hundredths, 25 provided that, for a taxable year beginning on or after January first, 26 two thousand twenty-six, such denominator shall be equal to ten and 27 sixty-two one-hundredths, [except] and provided further that in the case 28 of a financial corporation as defined in clause (i) of subparagraph one 29 of paragraph (e) of subdivision one of this section, such denominator, 30 for a taxable year beginning before January first, two thousand twenty- 31 six, is nine, and, for a taxable year beginning on or after January 32 first, two thousand twenty-six, is ten and eight-tenths, and provided 33 further that in the case of a taxpayer that is subject to paragraph (j) 34 or (k) of subdivision one of this section, such denominator shall be the 35 rate of tax as determined by such paragraph (j) or (k) for the taxable 36 year. If the credit allowed under this subdivision or the sum of such 37 credits exceeds the product of such tax and such fraction, the amount of 38 the excess may be carried forward, in order, to each of the seven imme- 39 diately succeeding taxable years and, to the extent not previously 40 taken, shall be allowed as a credit in each of such years. In applying 41 the provisions of the preceding sentence, the credit determined for the 42 taxable year under paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be taken 43 before taking any credit carryforward pursuant to this paragraph and the 44 credit carryforward attributable to the earliest taxable year shall be 45 taken before taking a credit carryforward attributable to a subsequent 46 taxable year. 47 § 14. The local legislative body of the city of New York is hereby 48 authorized and empowered to ratify and approve by local law the amend- 49 ments set forth in sections two through thirteen of this act, provided 50 that: (i) where such local legislative body ratifies and approves the 51 amendments set forth in section three, four, or five of this act, such 52 local legislative body shall ratify and approve the amendments set forth 53 in all of such sections three, four, and five of this act; (ii) where 54 such local legislative body ratifies and approves the amendments set 55 forth in section six, seven, or eight of this act, such local legisla- 56 tive body shall ratify and approve the amendments set forth in all of S. 9189--A 8 1 such sections six, seven, and eight of this act; and (iii) where such 2 local legislative body ratifies and approves the amendments set forth in 3 section nine, ten, eleven, twelve, or thirteen of this act, such local 4 legislative body shall ratify and approve the amendments set forth in 5 all of such sections nine, ten, eleven, twelve, and thirteen of this 6 act. 7 § 15. This act shall take effect immediately, except that sections two 8 through thirteen of this act shall take effect only upon enactment of a 9 local law of the city of New York as described in section fourteen of 10 this act and shall be deemed to have been in full force and effect as of 11 January 1, 2026 and apply to taxable years beginning on or after such 12 date, provided that, where the local legislative body of the city of New 13 York does not ratify and approve the amendments set forth in one or more 14 of such sections, the amendments set forth in such sections shall not 15 take effect. The city of New York shall notify the legislative bill 16 drafting commission upon enactment of such local law as described in 17 section fourteen of this act in order that the commission may maintain 18 an accurate and timely effective data base of the official text of the 19 laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effectuating the 20 provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the 21 public officers law.